Mississippi statutes. Title 7. Executive Department
Assistant Secretaries of State

§ 7-3-71.
Assistant secretaries of state; appointment; duties; compensation.

The secretary of state shall appoint four (4) competent attorneys, each of whom shall be designated as an assistant secretary of state. The assistants shall have power and authority under the direction and supervision of the secretary of state to perform all of the duties required by law of that officer; and each shall be liable to the pains and penalties to which the secretary of state is liable. The assistants shall serve at the will and pleasure of the secretary of state, and they shall devote their entire time and attention to the duties pertaining to the department of state as required by the general laws. The compensation for assistant secretaries of state shall be established by the legislature.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 304; Laws, 1978, ch. 520, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 1978.